Washington statutes.
RCW 3.50.425

Issuance of criminal process.

All criminal process issued by the municipal court shall be in the name of the state of Washington and run throughout the state, and be directed to and served by the chief of police, marshal, or other police officer of any city or to any sheriff in the state.

[ 1984 c 258 s 127.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Application—1984 c 258 ss 101-139: See note following RCW 3.50.005.